tables/la-g1.utb
letter \x0e81 1245
letter \x0e82 13
letter \x0e84 136
letter \x0E87 12456
letter \x0E88 245
letter \x0EAA 234
letter \x0E8A 2346
letter \x0E8D 13456
letter \x0E94 145
letter \x0E95 1256
letter \x0E96 2345
letter \x0E97 23456
letter \x0E99 1345
letter \x0E9A 1236
letter \x0E9B 12346
letter \x0E9C 1234
letter \x0E9D 1346
letter \x0E9E 1456
letter \x0E9F 1246
letter \x0EA1 134
letter \x0EA2 6-13456
letter \x0EA5 123
letter \x0EA7 2456
letter \x0EAB 125
letter \x0EAD 135
letter \x0EAE 123456
letter \x0EA3 1235
letter \x0EDD 6-134
letter \x0EDC 6-1345
letter \x0EBC 3
letter \x0EB0 1
letter \x0EB2 16
letter \x0EB4 12
letter \x0EB5 23
letter \x0EB6 246
letter \x0EB7 26
letter \x0EB8 36
letter \x0EB9 25
letter \x0EC0 124
letter \x0EC1 126
letter \x0EC2 24
letter \x0ECD 135
 #4 tone for laos voice
 letter \x0EC8 35
 letter \x0EC9 256
 letter \x0ECA 2356
 letter \x0ECB 236
 letter \x0EBB 14
 letter \x0EB1 345
 letter \x0EBD 456
 letter \x0EC4 156
 letter \x0EC3 156-2
 letter \x0EC6 2
 letter \x0EB3 1356
 #mixing vowles and consinants
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EB0 1245-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EC8\x0EB0 1245-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EC9\x0EB0 1245-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0ECA\x0EB0 1245-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0ECB\x0EB0 1245-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EB0 13-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EC8\x0EB0 13-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EC9\x0EB0 13-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0ECA\x0EB0 13-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0ECB\x0EB0 13-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EB0 136-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EC8\x0EB0 136-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EC9\x0EB0 136-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0ECA\x0EB0 136-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0ECB\x0EB0 136-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EB0 12456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EC8\x0EB0 12456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0EC9\x0EB0 12456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0ECA\x0EB0 12456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E87\x0ECB\x0EB0 12456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EB0 245-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EC8\x0EB0 245-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0EC9\x0EB0 245-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0ECA\x0EB0 245-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E88\x0ECB\x0EB0 245-124-1-236	
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EB0 234-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EC8\x0EB0 234-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0EC9\x0EB0 234-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0ECA\x0EB0 234-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAA\x0ECB\x0EB0 234-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EB0 2346-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EC8\x0EB0 2346-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0EC9\x0EB0 2346-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0ECA\x0EB0 2346-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E8A\x0ECB\x0EB0 2346-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EB0 13456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EC8\x0EB0 13456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0EC9\x0EB0 13456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0ECA\x0EB0 13456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E8D\x0ECB\x0EB0 13456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EB0 145-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EC8\x0EB0 145-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0EC9\x0EB0 145-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0ECA\x0EB0 145-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E94\x0ECB\x0EB0 145-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EB0 1256-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EC8\x0EB0 1256-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0EC9\x0EB0 1256-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0ECA\x0EB0 1256-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E95\x0ECB\x0EB0 1256-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EB0 2345-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EC8\x0EB0 2345-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0EC9\x0EB0 2345-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0ECA\x0EB0 2345-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E96\x0ECB\x0EB0 2345-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EB0 23456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EC8\x0EB0 23456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0EC9\x0EB0 23456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0ECA\x0EB0 23456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E97\x0ECB\x0EB0 23456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EB0 1345-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EC8\x0EB0 1345-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0EC9\x0EB0 1345-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0ECA\x0EB0 1345-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E99\x0ECB\x0EB0 1345-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EB0 1236-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EC8\x0EB0 1236-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0EC9\x0EB0 1236-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0ECA\x0EB0 1236-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9A\x0ECB\x0EB0 1236-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EB0 12346-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EC8\x0EB0 12346-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0EC9\x0EB0 12346-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0ECA\x0EB0 12346-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9B\x0ECB\x0EB0 12346-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EB0 1234-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EC8\x0EB0 1234-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0EC9\x0EB0 1234-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0ECA\x0EB0 1234-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9C\x0ECB\x0EB0 1234-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EB0 1346-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EC8\x0EB0 1346-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0EC9\x0EB0 1346-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0ECA\x0EB0 1346-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9D\x0ECB\x0EB0 1346-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EB0 1456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EC8\x0EB0 1456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0EC9\x0EB0 1456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0ECA\x0EB0 1456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9E\x0ECB\x0EB0 1456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EB0 1246-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EC8\x0EB0 1246-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0EC9\x0EB0 1246-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0ECA\x0EB0 1246-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E9F\x0ECB\x0EB0 1246-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EB0 134-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EC8\x0EB0 134-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0EC9\x0EB0 134-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0ECA\x0EB0 134-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA1\x0ECB\x0EB0 134-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EB0 6-13456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EC8\x0EB0 6-13456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0EC9\x0EB0 6-13456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0ECA\x0EB0 6-13456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA2\x0ECB\x0EB0 6-13456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EB0 123-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EC8\x0EB0 123-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0EC9\x0EB0 123-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0ECA\x0EB0 123-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA5\x0ECB\x0EB0 123-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EB0 1235-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EC8\x0EB0 1235-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0EC9\x0EB0 1235-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0ECA\x0EB0 1235-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA3\x0ECB\x0EB0 1235-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EB0 2456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EC8\x0EB0 2456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0EC9\x0EB0 2456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0ECA\x0EB0 2456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EA7\x0ECB\x0EB0 2456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EB0 125-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EC8\x0EB0 125-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EC9\x0EB0 125-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0ECA\x0EB0 125-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0ECB\x0EB0 125-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EB0 135-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EC8\x0EB0 135-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0EC9\x0EB0 135-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0ECA\x0EB0 135-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAD\x0ECB\x0EB0 135-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EB0 123456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EC8\x0EB0 123456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0EC9\x0EB0 123456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0ECA\x0EB0 123456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAE\x0ECB\x0EB0 123456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EB0 6-1345-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EC8\x0EB0 6-1345-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0EC9\x0EB0 6-1345-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0ECA\x0EB0 6-1345-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EDC\x0ECB\x0EB0 6-1345-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EB0 6-134-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EC8\x0EB0 6-134-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0EC9\x0EB0 6-134-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0ECA\x0EB0 6-134-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EDD\x0ECB\x0EB0 6-134-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB0 125-3-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EC8\x0EB0 125-3-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EC9\x0EB0 125-3-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECA\x0EB0 125-3-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECB\x0EB0 125-3-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB0 125-12456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EC8\x0EB0 125-12456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0EC9\x0EB0 125-12456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECA\x0EB0 125-12456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECB\x0EB0 125-12456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB0 125-13456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EC8\x0EB0 125-13456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EC9\x0EB0 125-13456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECA\x0EB0 125-13456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECB\x0EB0 125-13456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB0 125-1345-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EC8\x0EB0 125-1345-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0EC9\x0EB0 125-1345-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECA\x0EB0 125-1345-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECB\x0EB0 125-1345-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB0 125-123-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EC8\x0EB0 125-123-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EC9\x0EB0 125-123-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECA\x0EB0 125-123-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECB\x0EB0 125-123-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB0 125-2456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EC8\x0EB0 125-2456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EC9\x0EB0 125-2456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0ECA\x0EB0 125-2456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA7\x0ECB\x0EB0 125-2456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EB0 125-134-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EC8\x0EB0 125-134-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0EC9\x0EB0 125-134-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0ECA\x0EB0 125-134-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0EAB\x0EA1\x0ECB\x0EB0 125-134-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EB0 1245-2456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EC8\x0EB0 1245-2456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0EC9\x0EB0 1245-2456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0ECA\x0EB0 1245-2456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E81\x0EA7\x0ECB\x0EB0 1245-2456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EB0 13-2456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EC8\x0EB0 13-2456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0EC9\x0EB0 13-2456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0ECA\x0EB0 13-2456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E82\x0EA7\x0ECB\x0EB0 13-2456-124-1-236
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EB0 136-2456-124-1
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EC8\x0EB0 136-2456-124-1-35
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0EC9\x0EB0 136-2456-124-1-256
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0ECA\x0EB0 136-2456-124-1-2356
always \x0EC0\x0E84\x0EA7\x0ECB\x0EB0 136-2456-124-1-236
# ae vowels
always \x0EC1\x0E81\x0EB0 1245-126-1
always \x0EC1\x0E81\x0EC8\x0EB0 1245-126-1-35
always \x0EC1\x0E81\x0EC9\x0EB0 1245-126-1-256
always \x0EC1\x0E81\x0ECA\x0EB0 1245-126-1-2356
always \x0EC1\x0E81\x0ECB\x0EB0 1245-126-1-236
always \x0EC1\x0E82\x0EB0 13-126-1
always \x0EC1\x0E82\x0EC8\x0EB0 13-126-1-35
always \x0EC1\x0E82\x0EC9\x0EB0 13-126-1-256
always \x0EC1\x0E82\x0ECA\x0EB0 13-126-1-2356
always \x0EC1\x0E82\x0ECB\x0EB0 13-126-1-236
always \x0EC1\x0E84\x0EB0 136-126-1
always \x0EC1\x0E84\x0EC8\x0EB0 136-126-1-35
always \x0EC1\x0E84\x0EC9\x0EB0 136-126-1-256
always \x0EC1\x0E84\x0ECA\x0EB0 136-126-1-2356
always \x0EC1\x0E84\x0ECB\x0EB0 136-126-1-236
always \x0EC1\x0E87\x0EB0 12456-126-1
always \x0EC1\x0E87\x0EC8\x0EB0 12456-126-1-35
always \x0EC1\x0E87\x0EC9\x0EB0 12456-126-1-256
always \x0EC1\x0E87\x0ECA\x0EB0 12456-126-1-2356
always \x0EC1\x0E87\x0ECB\x0EB0 12456-126-1-236
always \x0EC1\x0E88\x0EB0 245-126-1
always \x0EC1\x0E88\x0EC8\x0EB0 245-126-1-35
always \x0EC1\x0E88\x0EC9\x0EB0 245-126-1-256
always \x0EC1\x0E88\x0ECA\x0EB0 245-126-1-2356
always \x0EC1\x0E88\x0ECB\x0EB0 245-126-1-236	
always \x0EC1\x0EAA\x0EB0 234-126-1
always \x0EC1\x0EAA\x0EC8\x0EB0 234-126-1-35
always \x0EC1\x0EAA\x0EC9\x0EB0 234-126-1-256
always \x0EC1\x0EAA\x0ECA\x0EB0 234-126-1-2356
always \x0EC1\x0EAA\x0ECB\x0EB0 234-126-1-236
always \x0EC1\x0E8A\x0EB0 2346-126-1
always \x0EC1\x0E8A\x0EC8\x0EB0 2346-126-1-35
always \x0EC1\x0E8A\x0EC9\x0EB0 2346-126-1-256
always \x0EC1\x0E8A\x0ECA\x0EB0 2346-126-1-2356
always \x0EC1\x0E8A\x0ECB\x0EB0 2346-126-1-236
always \x0EC1\x0E8D\x0EB0 13456-126-1
always \x0EC1\x0E8D\x0EC8\x0EB0 13456-126-1-35
